Tennessee, session 114S1, SB6004.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 50-7-302(a), is amended by
designating the existing language as subdivision (a)(1) and adding the following as a new
subdivision (a)(2):
(2) Upon declaration of an emergency pursuant to § 58-2-107, the provisions of
subdivisions (a)(1)(C)-(a)(1)(E) are suspended to the extent necessary to allow the
commissioner the discretion to amend such reporting requirements upon receiving
appropriate federal guidance. Such a suspension is limited to eligible claimants who
reside or work in counties for which this state has requested a major disaster
declaration.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 58-2-106(b), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision (b)(19) and redesignating the existing subdivision (b)(19)
accordingly:
(19) Have authority to assist a political subdivision or local emergency
management agency with recovery from disasters and emergencies on public property
at the request of the political subdivision or agency.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB6004
001505
- 1 -